Maryland, session 2026, HB1615.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Corporations and Associations
5–6B–26.1.
(g) (1) The governing body of a cooperative housing corporation shall, in
consultation with a person identified under subsection (d)(1) of this section, develop a
funding plan to determine how to fund the reserves necessary under this section.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1615*

HOUSE BILL 1615
(2) In developing the funding plan under this subsection, the governing
body shall select one of the following methods to achieve the reserve funding under this
section:
(i) The component method;
(ii) The cash flow method;
(iii) The baseline funding method;
(iv) The threshold cash flow method; or
(v) Any other funding method consistent with generally accepted
accounting principles.
(3) A funding plan developed under this subsection shall prioritize
adequate amounts for repair and replacement of common elements of the cooperative
housing corporation that are necessary for:
(i) The health, safety, and well–being of the occupants;
(ii) Ensuring structural integrity, such as roofing replacements and
maintaining structural systems;
(iii) Essential functioning, such as plumbing, sewer, heating, cooling,
and electrical infrastructure; and
(iv) Any other essential or critical purpose, as determined by the
governing body.
(4) Reserves may be used for purposes other than those specified in the
funding plan IN AN EMERGENCY if [the]:
(I) THE funds are repaid to the reserve fund within 5 years after
their use; AND
(II) THE USE OF THE FUNDS IS APPROVED BY AN AFFIRMATIVE
VOTE OF AT LEAST TWO–THIRDS OF THE MEMBERS IN GOOD STANDING IN THE
COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION.
(5) A governing body shall review progress toward compliance with the
funding plan developed under this subsection at each annual meeting of the governing
body.
Article – Real Property

HOUSE BILL 1615 3
11–109.4.
(f) (1) The governing body of a condominium shall, in consultation with a
person identified under subsection (e)(1) of this section, develop a funding plan to determine
how to fund the reserves necessary under this section.
(2) In developing the funding plan under this subsection, the governing
body shall select one of the following methods to achieve the reserve funding under this
section:
(i) The component method;
(ii) The cash flow method;
(iii) The baseline funding method;
(iv) The threshold cash flow method; or
(v) Any other funding method consistent with generally accepted
accounting principles.
(3) A funding plan developed under this subsection shall prioritize
adequate amounts for repair and replacement of common elements of the condominium
that are necessary for:
(i) The health, safety, and well–being of the occupants;
(ii) Ensuring structural integrity, such as roofing replacements and
maintaining structural systems;
(iii) Essential functioning, such as plumbing, sewer, heating, cooling,
and electrical infrastructure; and
(iv) Any other essential or critical purpose, as determined by the
governing body.
(4) Reserves may be used for purposes other than those specified in the
funding plan IN AN EMERGENCY if [the]:
(I) THE funds are repaid to the reserve fund within 5 years after
their use; AND
(II) THE USE OF THE FUNDS IS APPROVED BY AN AFFIRMATIVE
VOTE OF AT LEAST TWO–THIRDS OF THE UNIT OWNERS IN GOOD STANDING IN THE
COUNCIL.

HOUSE BILL 1615
(5) A governing body shall review progress toward compliance with the
funding plan developed under this subsection at each annual meeting of the governing
body.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.